Mississippi, session 2026, SB2673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is hereby established the "Occupational Licensure Boards Consolidation Study Committee" created to examine the possibility and effectiveness of consolidating state licensure boards into the Department of Occupational Licensure.  The study committee shall develop recommendations to the Legislature on changes to policy and laws in Mississippi with a goal of increasing efficiency by consolidating and streamlining the occupational licensing boards and processes associated with said boards. (2)  The members of the study committee shall be as follows: (a)  The Chairman of the Government Structures Committee of the Senate and the Chairman of the State Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives, or their designees; (b)  The Chairmen of the Accountability, Efficiency and Transparency committees of the Senate and House of Representatives, or their designees; (c)  Five (5) members currently serving on different occupational licensure boards in the state, appointed by the Governor; (d)  Two (2) senators appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; and (e)  Two (2) representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. (3)  The study committee shall meet within forty-five (45) days of the effective date of this act and shall evaluate the current data, resources, laws and policies that concern and impact occupational licensure boards in the State of Mississippi.  Specifically, the study committee shall make recommendations concerning: (a)  The benefits of consolidating states occupational licensure boards; (b)  Which, if any, boards could feasibly be consolidate within a shared department; (c)  A timeline, which includes any and all steps necessary for a smooth and successful consolidation of suggested licensure boards; (d)  Location recommendations for the new department; and (e)  Any information deemed necessary and relevant to accomplish the tasks assigned in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection. (4)  To effectuate the purposes of this act, any occupational licensure board, department, division, board, bureau, committee, institution or agency of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, shall, at the request of the study committee, provide the facilities, assistance, information and data needed to enable the study committee to carry out its duties. (5)  The Chairman of the Senate Government Structures Committee shall call the first meeting.  The members of the study committee shall elect a chairman, vice chairman and any other officers determined to be necessary, from among the members at its first meeting.  The study committee shall develop and report its findings and recommendations to the Mississippi Legislature on or before December 1, 2026. A majority of the membership shall be required to approve any final report and recommendation. (6)  Meetings of the study committee shall be held at the State Capitol; however, if it is not feasible for the study committee to hold an in-person meeting, the study committee may convene utilizing an online meeting platform that is accessible for viewing by the public.  All members shall be notified in writing of all meetings, such notice shall be mailed at least five (5) days before the date on which a meeting is to be held.       (7)  Members of the study committee that serve in the Legislature shall be reimbursed in the same manner as attending out of session committee meetings. (8)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review shall provide necessary clerical support for the meetings of the study committee and the preparation of the report. (9)  Upon the presentation of its report to the Legislature, the study committee shall be dissolved. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.